Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2004
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298; Laws 2015, LB157, § 10. Operative date January 1, 2017. Forms.

(1) The Secretary of State may prescribe and furnish on request forms for (a) an application for a certificate of existence, (b) a foreign corporation's application for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, and (c) a foreign corporation's application for a certificate of withdrawal. If the Secretary of State so requires, use of these forms shall be mandatory.

(2) The Secretary of State may prescribe and furnish on request forms for other documents required or permitted to be filed by the Business Corporation Act, but the use of such forms shall not be mandatory.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 4.